California statutes. Education Code
The boards of supervisors of the several counties may establish and maintain, within their respective counties, county free libraries pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19101.

The board of supervisors of any county may establish at the county seat or elsewhere in the county, a county free library for that part of the county lying outside of cities maintaining free public libraries, and outside of library districts maintaining district libraries, and for all such additional portions of the county as may elect to become a part of, or to participate in, the county free library system as provided in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19102.

At least once a week for two successive weeks prior to taking any action, the board of supervisors shall publish, in a newspaper designated by it and published in the county, notice of the contemplated action, giving the date of the meeting at which the action is proposed to be taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19103.

After the establishment of a county free library, the board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of any city in the county maintaining a free public library, or the board of trustees of any library district maintaining a district library, may notify the board of supervisors that the city or library district desires to become a part of the county free library system. Thereafter the city or library district shall be a part of the system and its inhabitants shall be entitled to the benefits of the county free library, and the property within the city or library district shall be liable to taxes levied for county free library purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.

(a) The board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district may, on or before January 1 of any year, notify the county board of supervisors that the city or library district no longer desires to be a part of the county free library system. The notice shall be accompanied by a statement complying with the requirements of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall file the statement with the county assessor and the State Board of Equalization. Thereafter the city or library district shall cease to participate in the benefits of the county free library system, and the property situated
 in the city or library district shall not be liable for taxes for county free library purposes.

(b) If the board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district intends to withdraw from the county free library system and operate the city’s or the district’s library or libraries with a private contractor that will employ library staff to achieve cost savings, the requirements of Section 19104.5 shall apply, unless the library or libraries are funded only by the proceeds of a special tax imposed by the city or library district pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (AB 438)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.5.

(a) The board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district in which a withdrawal from the county free library system becomes effective on or after January 1, 2012, shall comply with all of the following requirements before entering into a contract to operate the city’s or the district’s library or libraries with a private contractor that will employ library staff to achieve cost savings:

(1) At least once a week for four consecutive weeks before taking any action, the board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of the city or the board of trustees of the library district shall publish, in a newspaper designated by it and circulated throughout the city or library district, notice of
 the contemplated action, giving the date and place of the meeting at which the contemplated action is proposed to be taken.

(2) The board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district shall clearly demonstrate that the contract will result in actual overall cost savings to the city or library district for the duration of the entire contract as compared with the city’s or library district’s actual costs of providing the same services, provided that, in comparing costs, all of the following occur:

(A) The city’s or library district’s additional cost of providing the same services as proposed by the contract shall be included. These additional costs shall include the salaries and benefits of additional staff that would be needed and the cost of additional space, equipment, and materials needed to perform the necessary
 functions of the library.

(B) The city’s or library district’s indirect overhead costs shall not be included unless those costs can be attributed solely to the function in question and would not exist if that function was not performed by the city or library district. For purposes of this subparagraph, “indirect overhead costs” means the pro rata share of existing administrative salaries and benefits, rent, equipment costs, utilities, and materials.

(C) The cost of a contractor providing a service for any continuing city or library district costs that would be directly associated with the contracted function shall be included. Continuing city or library district costs shall include, but not be limited to, costs for inspection, supervision, and monitoring.

(3) The contract shall not be approved solely on the basis
 that savings will result from lower contractor pay rates or benefits. Contracts shall be eligible for approval if the contractor’s wages are at the industry’s level and do not undercut city or library district pay rates.

(4) The contract shall not cause an existing city or library district employee to incur a loss of his or her employment or employment seniority, a reduction in wages, benefits, or hours, or an involuntary transfer to a new location requiring a change in residence.

(5) The contract shall be awarded through a publicized, competitive bidding process.

(6) The contract shall include specific provisions pertaining to the qualifications of the staff that will perform the work under the contract, as well as assurances that the contractor’s hiring practices meet applicable nondiscrimination standards.

(7) The contract shall provide that it may be terminated at any time by the city or library district without penalty if there is a material breach of the contract and notice is provided within 30 days of termination.

(8) If the contract is for library services in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) annually, all of the following shall occur:

(A) The city or library district shall require the contractor to disclose all of the following information as part of its bid, application, or answer to a request for proposal:

(i) A description of all charges, claims, or complaints filed against the contractor with any federal, state, or local administrative agency during the prior 10 years.

(ii) A description of all civil complaints filed against the contractor in any state or federal court during the prior 10 years.

(iii) A description of all state or federal criminal complaints or indictments filed against the contractor, or any of its officers, directors, or managers, at any time.

(iv) A description of any debarments of the contractor by any public agency or licensing body at any time.

(B) The city or library district shall include in the contract specific, measurable performance standards and provisions for a performance audit by the city or library district, or an independent auditor approved by the city or library district, to determine whether the performance standards are being met and whether the contractor is in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. The city or library
 district shall not renew or extend the contract before receiving and considering the audit report.

(C) The contract shall include provisions for an audit by the city or library district, or an independent auditor approved by the city or library district, to determine whether and to what extent the anticipated cost savings have actually been realized. The city or library district shall not renew or extend the contract before receiving and considering the audit report.

(9) The term of the contract shall not be more than five years from the date on which the board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district approves the contract.

(b) This section does not preclude a city, library district, or local government from adopting more restrictive rules
 regarding the contracting of public services.

(c) This section shall not apply to contracts between a city or library district and a nonprofit organization if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The nonprofit organization shall not be a parent or subsidiary of a for-profit entity.

(2) The contract shall prohibit the nonprofit organization from subcontracting the obligation to operate the library or libraries and to employ and supervise library staff.

(d) This section shall not apply to a library or libraries that are funded only by the proceeds of a special tax imposed by the city or library district pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 3.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19105.

If the notice is given after January 1st of any year, the property situated in the city or library district shall be liable to taxes for county free library purposes during the immediately succeeding year, and the notice shall not be effective until the next succeeding year, and library service shall be rendered in the city or library district during the year for which taxes are levied for library purposes in the city or library district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19106.

Before any board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of any city, or the board of trustees of any library district gives notice that the city or library district desires to become a part of the county free library system, or gives notice of withdrawal from the system, the board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of the city or the board of trustees of the library district shall publish at least once a week for two successive weeks prior to the giving of either notice, in a newspaper designated by the board of trustees, common council, or other legislative body of the city or the board of library trustees of the library district, and circulating throughout the city or library district, notice of the contemplated action, giving the date and the place of the meeting at which the contemplated action is proposed to be taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19107.

The board of supervisors of any county in which a county free library has been established may enter into contracts with any city maintaining a free public library, and any such city, through its board of trustees or other legislative body, may enter into contracts with the county to secure to the residents of the city the same privileges of the county free library as are granted to, or enjoyed by, the residents of the county outside of the city, or such privileges as are agreed upon in the contract, upon such consideration named in the contract as is agreed upon, to be paid into the county free library fund. Thereupon the residents of the city shall have the same privileges with regard to the county free library as the residents of the county outside of the city, or such privileges as are agreed upon by the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19108.

The board of supervisors of any county in which a county free library has been established may enter into a contract with the board of supervisors of any other county to secure to the residents of the other county such privileges of the county free library as are agreed upon by the contract and upon such considerations as are agreed upon in the contract to be paid into the county free library fund. Thereupon the inhabitants of the other county shall have such privileges of the county free library as are agreed upon by the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19109.

The board of supervisors of any county may enter into a contract with the board of supervisors of another county in which a county free library has been established, and may levy a library tax, for the purpose of carrying out the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19110.

The board of supervisors of any county may contract with the board of supervisors of any other county or two or more other counties to provide for the services of a single qualified librarian to serve simultaneously as the county librarian of each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 52, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19111.

The making of the contract shall not bar the board of supervisors of the county during the continuance of the contract from establishing a county free library under the provisions of this chapter if none is already established. Upon the establishment of any county free library, the contract may be terminated upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, or may continue for the term thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19112.

Instead of establishing a separate county free library, the board of supervisors may enter into a contract with the board of library trustees or other authority in charge of the free public library of any city and the board of library trustees, or other authority in charge of the free public library, may make such a contract. The contract may provide that the free public library of the city shall assume the functions of a county free library within the county with which the contract is made, including cities in the county. The board of supervisors may agree to pay annually into the library fund of the city such sum as may be agreed upon. Either party to the contract may terminate the contract by giving six months’ notice of intention to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19113.

After a county free library has been established, it may be disestablished in the same manner as it was established. At least once a week for two successive weeks prior to taking any action, the board of supervisors shall publish, in a newspaper designated by them, and published in the county, notice of the contemplated action, giving therein the date of the meeting at which the contemplated action is proposed to be taken.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19114.

Whenever any of the territory being served by a county free library is annexed to, or otherwise included within, any municipal corporation not served by the county free library, the board of supervisors of the county shall order the county free library to continue to serve the territory annexed to, or otherwise included within the municipality, until the end of the fiscal year or years for which a tax has been levied upon the property of the annexed territory for the support of the county free library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19115.

The board of supervisors may establish a reasonable fee to be collected from persons who desire to participate in the services and benefits of the county free library and who are not residents of the territory in the county which is liable for taxes for county free library purposes. In establishing the fee, the board may also prescribe such regulations or limitations applicable to the use of the county free library by such persons as may reasonably be necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19116.

(a) (1) Sections 19104 and 19105 are not applicable to the withdrawal of a city or library district from the county free library system in Los Angeles County or Riverside County. The legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district, whose jurisdiction is within the County of Los Angeles or the County of Riverside, may notify the board of supervisors for Los Angeles County or Riverside County, as appropriate, that the city or library district no longer desires to be a part of the county free library system. The notice shall state whether the city or library district intends to acquire property pursuant to subdivision (c). The board of supervisors shall transmit a copy of the notice to the Los Angeles County Assessor or Riverside County Assessor, as appropriate, the Los Angeles County
 Auditor or Riverside County Auditor, as appropriate, and the State Board of Equalization.

(2) The legislative body of a city or the board of trustees of a library district in which a withdrawal from the county free library system in Los Angeles County or Riverside County becomes effective on or after January 1, 2012, shall comply with the requirements of Section 19104.5 before entering into a contract to operate the city’s or the district’s library or libraries with a private contractor that will employ library staff to achieve cost savings, unless the library or libraries are funded only by the proceeds of a special tax imposed by the city or library district pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(b) When a city or library district files a notice pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall remain a member of the county free library system until July 1 of the base year or the date on which property is transferred pursuant to subdivision (c), whichever date is later. Upon ceasing to be a member of the county free library system, the city or library district shall not participate in any benefits of the county free library system, and shall assume the responsibility for the provision of library services within its jurisdiction. Unless otherwise agreed by July 1 of the base year in writing by the
 Board of Supervisors of Los Angeles County or the Board of Supervisors of Riverside County, as appropriate, and the withdrawing city or library district, an amount of property tax revenue equal to the property tax revenues allocated to the county free library pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 96) of Chapter 6 of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code in the fiscal year before the base year and that were derived from property situated within the boundaries of the withdrawing entity shall be allocated to and used to maintain library services by the withdrawing entity in the base year and, adjusted forward, in each fiscal year thereafter at the same time allocations are made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 96) of Chapter 6 of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. This subdivision shall not apply to property tax revenues that have been pledged to repay bonded indebtedness of the county free library system.

(c) If there are one or more county library facilities within the territorial boundaries of the withdrawing entity at the time the withdrawing entity provides notice pursuant to subdivision (a), the
 withdrawing entity shall have the right to acquire any or all of those facilities from the county and the county shall, no later than July 1 of the base year, transfer to the withdrawing entity each facility to be acquired and the personal property therein related to the provision of library services. If the facility or personal property was purchased with bond proceeds or other forms of indebtedness, acquisition shall only take place if the withdrawing entity assumes any remaining indebtedness and in no way impairs the repayment thereof. If the withdrawing entity opts not to acquire any facilities or personal property, the county at its discretion may dispose of the facilities or personal property or convert the use of those facilities or personal property, including transferring collections and other personal property to other sites and converting facilities to other purposes. If the withdrawing entity opts to acquire any facilities or personal property, the acquisition prices shall be as follows unless
 otherwise provided for by statute or contract:

(1) Each county library facility which, for purposes of this section, shall include the real property upon which the facility is located and any fixtures therein and shall not include computer systems and software, shall be transferred for the lesser of:

(A) No cost, if the facility was donated to the county by the withdrawing entity.

(B) The price paid to the withdrawing entity by the county for the facility, if the county bought the facility from the withdrawing entity. However, if the county constructed capital improvements to the facility after it was bought from the withdrawing entity, the county’s total out-of-pocket costs for the capital improvement excluding any costs for routine repairs, restoration, or maintenance, shall be added to the price.

(C) The fair market value of the facility. However, if any portion of the facility was donated to the county by the withdrawing entity or if any moneys were donated by the withdrawing entity toward the county’s construction or acquisition of the facility or any portion thereof, the value of the donation shall be subtracted from the fair market value.

(2) Any personal property within the facility related to the provision of library services, including books and resource materials, computer systems and software, furniture, and furnishings, shall be transferred for the lesser of:

(A) No cost, if the property was donated to the county by the withdrawing entity.

(B) The fair market value of the personal property. However, on or before the March 1 preceding the
 July 1 of the base year, the county librarian may designate collections of resource books and materials that are unique in, and integral to, the county free library system to be special collections. The special collections shall be acquired by the withdrawing entity only upon mutually agreeable terms and conditions.

(d) If a facility transferred pursuant to subdivision (c) serves residents of surrounding jurisdictions, the board of supervisors governing the county free library system may require, as a condition of transferring the facility, that the library services provided by the withdrawing entity to its residents also be available on the same basis to the residents of the surrounding jurisdictions. However, if the withdrawing entity contributes to the provision of library services from other city funds, or through taxes, assessments, or fees of its residents, the withdrawing entity may provide additional services to its residents. If the
 requirement to provide regional services is imposed and, unless otherwise agreed in writing by the county and the withdrawing entity by July 1 of the base year, an amount of property tax revenues equal to the property tax revenues derived from property situated in the surrounding jurisdictions that were, in the fiscal year before the base year, allocated to the county free library system pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 96) of Chapter 6 of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be allocated to and used to maintain library services by the withdrawing entity in the base year and, adjusted forward, in each fiscal year thereafter at the same time other allocations are made pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 96) of Chapter 6 of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. This subdivision shall not apply to property tax revenues that have been pledged to repay bonded indebtedness. If a surrounding jurisdiction subsequently provides notice of its intent
 to withdraw from the county free library system pursuant to subdivision (a), on the date the surrounding jurisdiction ceases to participate in the benefits of the county free library system pursuant to subdivision (b), the withdrawing entity shall no longer be required to make library services available to the residents of the surrounding jurisdiction and property tax revenues derived from property situated in the surrounding jurisdiction shall no longer be allocated to the withdrawing entity pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Base year” means the fiscal year commencing on the July 1 following the December 2 following the date of the notice given pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section.

(2) “Fair market value” means:

(A) Any value agreed upon by the withdrawing entity and the county.

(B) If no agreement as to value is reached by the March 1 preceding the July 1 of the base year, the value assigned by an appraiser agreed upon by the withdrawing entity and the county.

(C) If no agreement as to the appointment of an appraiser is reached pursuant to subparagraph (B) by the April 1 preceding the July 1 of the base year, the value assigned by an appraiser agreed upon between the withdrawing entity’s appraiser and the county’s appraiser.

(D) If no agreement as to the appointment of an appraiser is reached pursuant to subparagraph (C) by the May 1 preceding the July 1 of the base year, the value assigned by a state-certified appraiser designated by the withdrawing entity. The
 designated appraiser shall provide the appraisal in writing to the county no later than the June 1 preceding the July 1 of the base year.

(E) The withdrawing entity shall reimburse the county for any appraisal costs the county incurs in determining the fair market value pursuant to this section.

(3) “Surrounding jurisdictions” means cities and library districts that are adjacent to the withdrawing entity and tax rate areas in unincorporated areas of the county that are wholly or partially within the withdrawing entity’s sphere of influence, that are within the county free library system, and that have no facility within their territorial boundaries providing library services at the time the withdrawing entity provides notice pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 196, Sec. 2.   (AB 583)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Librarian [19140. - 19150.]

19140.

Upon the establishment of a county free library, the board of supervisors shall appoint a county librarian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19141.

If any county adopts a civil service system or a limited civil service system for county officers and employees, the county librarian shall be entitled to the benefits of such civil service system.

This section does not limit any powers conferred on any county by charter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19142.

No person may be appointed to the office of county librarian on or after January 1, 1987, unless he or she possesses both of the following qualifications:

(a) Graduation from a graduate library school program accredited by the American Library Association.

(b) Demonstrated knowledge of principles and practices of public administration, including county government, and of the laws applicable to library service in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 269, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19143.

At the time of his or her appointment, the county librarian need not be a citizen of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 52, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19145.

The county librarian shall, prior to entering upon his duties, file the usual oath, and he shall be required to file an official bond in an amount determined by the board of supervisors, unless he is covered by a master bond pursuant to Section 1481 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19146.

The county librarian shall, subject to the general rules adopted by the board of supervisors, build up and manage, according to accepted principles of library management, a library for the use of the people of the county, and shall determine what books and other library equipment shall be purchased.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19147.

The salary of the county librarians shall be paid by each of the counties in equal monthly installments, at the same time and in the same manner and out of the same fund as the salaries of other county officers are paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19148.

The board of supervisors of a county over 400,000 population, as determined by the 1960 decennial census, maintaining a county free library may provide that the salary of the county librarian be paid from the same fund used for maintaining and operating the county free library.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as modifying the status of the county librarian as a county official pursuant to Section 24000 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19149.

The county librarian and his assistant shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred on the business of the office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19150.

Except when the county librarian is temporarily absent, no person shall serve in the position of county librarian under the title of acting county librarian, or assistant librarian in charge, or any other such title, unless the person meets the qualifications set forth in Section 19142.

In the event qualified candidates for the position of the county librarian cannot be found, the county supervisors shall secure a written permission from the State Librarian to appoint an unqualified person to the position. This written permission may be granted by the State Librarian for a period of time up to but not exceeding one year. The State Librarian may from time to time in his or her discretion renew the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 269, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Government [19160. - 19180.]

19160.

The county free library is under the general supervision of the board of supervisors, which may:

(a) Make general rules and regulations regarding the policy of the county free library.

(b) Establish, upon the recommendation of the county librarian, branches and stations throughout the county and may locate the branches and stations in cities wherever deemed advisable.

(c) Determine the number and kind of employees of the library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

19167.

The county free libraries are under the general supervision of the State Librarian, who shall from time to time, either personally or by one of his or her assistants, visit the county free libraries and inquire into their condition. The actual and necessary expenses of the visits shall be paid out of the moneys appropriated for the support of the California State Library.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

19168.

The State Librarian shall annually call a convention of county librarians, to assemble at such time and place as he deems most convenient, for the discussion of questions pertaining to the supervision and administration of the county free libraries, the laws relating thereto, and such other subjects affecting the welfare and interest of the county free libraries as are properly brought before it. All county librarians shall attend and take part in the proceedings of the convention. The actual and necessary expenses of the county librarians attending the convention shall be paid out of the county free library fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19169.

The county librarian shall, on or before August 31st, in each year, report to the board of supervisors and to the State Librarian on the condition of the county free library, for the year ending June 30th preceding. The reports shall, in addition to other matters deemed expedient by the county librarian, contain such statistical and other information as is deemed desirable by the State Librarian. For this purpose the State Librarian may send to the several county librarians instructions or question blanks so as to obtain the material for a comparative study of library conditions in the state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19171.

The county board of supervisors of any county may in its discretion allocate and appropriate any funds received by the county under the State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972 (Public Law 92-512) for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and purchasing property for the county free library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19173.

The board of supervisors may create special taxing zones within the territory of the county subject to taxation for county free library purposes for the purpose of levying special taxes within the zones when it is found by the board that the territory within the zones require special services or special facilities in addition to those provided generally by the county free library system and that the special tax levy is commensurate with the special benefits to be provided in the zones.

Taxes levied pursuant to this section, together with taxes levied pursuant to Section 19170, shall not exceed the higher of the limit provided by Section 19170 or the applicable provisions of Section 2263 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19174.

The board of supervisors may receive, on behalf of the county, any gift, bequest, or devise for the county free library, or for any branch or subdivision of the library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19174.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, funds from the county general fund may be used to support the county free library.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 331.)
-------------------------------------------

19175.

The title to all property belonging to the county free library is vested in the county. All laws applicable to the collection of county taxes shall apply to the collection of the taxes provided in Section 19170. All moneys of the county free library, whether derived from taxation or otherwise, shall be in the custody of the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

19176.

Each claim against the county free library fund shall be authorized and approved by the county librarian, or in his absence from the county by his assistant. It shall then be acted upon in the same manner as other claims against the county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19177.

In any county of this state where a law library exists under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, the board of supervisors of the county may enter into contracts, or agreements with the board of law library trustees of the law library for the cooperation of the law library and the county free library, and, in that connection, may contract or agree with the board of law library trustees of the law library that the county librarian and other employees of the county free library perform the duties required to be done or performed by the officers and employees of the law library for a compensation to be named in the contract or agreement, and to be paid into the county free library fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19178.

The board of supervisors may accept on behalf of the county free library, all books and other property of school libraries and of the teachers’ library, and may manage and maintain them as a part of the county free library.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19179.

Any county library which was established and existed on April 26, 1911, under the provisions of an act entitled “An act to provide county library systems,” approved April 12, 1909, is continued under the provisions of this chapter and shall be considered the same as if established under the provisions of this chapter. If a contract has been entered into between any county board of supervisors and any city pursuant to this article, the contract shall continue in force, and the provisions of Section 19112 shall be applicable thereto, until the establishment and equipment of a county free library under the provisions of this chapter, unless sooner terminated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

19180.

The board of supervisors of any county in which there has been established a county free library which does not serve the entire county may, on behalf of the county free library, construct, build, repair or refurnish buildings to be used for county free library purposes, payment for which may be made from the general fund of the county. If payment is made from the county’s general fund, the county auditor shall each fiscal year thereafter transfer from the county free library fund to the county’s general fund as a prior claim against the county free library fund for as many years as are determined by the board of supervisors but not to exceed 20, an equal annual installment in such amount that over the designated period of years the entire payment from the county’s general fund will be completely repaid. Payment of the costs of the construction of a county free library building may also be made from the employees retirement fund of a retirement system established under the authority of the County Employees Retirement Law of 1937 as an investment of that fund and under the conditions specified in that law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. California State Library [19300. - 19354.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [19300. - 19307.]

19300.
